Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.450

Electronic cattle transaction reporting system—License—Fee—Report to the legislature—Adoption of rules.

(1)(a) The director may establish an electronic cattle transaction reporting system as a mechanism for reporting transactions involving cattle to the department. The system may be used as an alternative to mandatory inspections under RCW 16.57.160. The system may be used to report the inspection of animals that are being moved out-of-state.

(b) A cattle transaction described in (a) of this subsection, that would otherwise trigger a mandatory inspection under rules adopted pursuant to RCW 16.57.160, is eligible to report electronically under this section.

(c) Transactions that may be reported electronically include any sale, trade, gift, barter, or any other transaction that constitutes a change of ownership of cattle.

(2) A person may not electronically report change of ownership transactions involving cattle under this section without first obtaining an electronic cattle transaction reporting license from the director. Applicants for an electronic cattle transaction reporting license must submit an application to the department on a form provided by the department and must include an application fee. The amount of the application fee must be established by the director by rule consistent with subsection (8) of this section.

(3) All holders of an electronic cattle transaction reporting license must transmit to the department a record of each transaction containing the unique identification of each individual animal included in the transaction as assigned through a department-authorized identification method. The transmission required under this subsection must be completed no more than twenty-four hours after a qualifying transaction involving cattle.

(4) All holders of an electronic cattle transaction reporting license must keep accurate records of all transactions involving cattle and make those records available for inspection by the department upon reasonable request during normal business hours. All records of the licensed property must be retained for at least three years.

(5)(a) The director may enter the property of the holder of an electronic cattle transaction reporting license at any reasonable time to conduct examinations and inspections of cattle and any associated records for movement verification purposes. For purposes of this section, "any reasonable time" means during regular business hours or during any working shift.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to interfere with an examination and inspection of cattle and records performed under this subsection.

(c) If the director is denied access to a property or cattle for the purposes of this subsection, or a person fails to comply with an order of the director, the director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant. To show that access is denied, the director must file with the court an affidavit or declaration containing a description of all attempts to notify and locate the owner or owner's agent and secure consent.

(6)(a) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke an electronic cattle transaction reporting license issued under this section if the director finds that an electronic cattle transaction reporting license holder:

(i) Fails to satisfy the reporting requirements as provided in this section;

(ii) Knowingly makes false or inaccurate statements;

(iii) Has previously had an electronic cattle transaction reporting license revoked;

(iv) Denies entry to property, cattle, or records as provided in subsection (5) of this section; or

(v) Violates any other provision of this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter.

(b) Any action taken under this subsection must be consistent with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(c) If an electronic cattle transaction reporting license is denied, suspended, or revoked, then the mandatory cattle inspection requirements under RCW 16.57.160 apply to any future transactions.

(7) The department must submit an annual report to the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, that documents all examinations and inspections of cattle and records of electronic cattle transaction reporting license holders performed by the department either since the department's last report or since the adoption of the electronic cattle transaction reporting system. The annual report must also include details regarding any actions the department took following the examinations and inspections. All reports required under this section must be submitted by July 31st of each year.

(8)(a) The director may adopt rules:

(i) Designating the conditions of licensure under this section and the use of the electronic cattle transaction reporting system authorized by this section;

(ii) Establishing an initial application fee and a license renewal fee applicable to the electronic cattle transaction reporting license; and

(iii) Establishing any fees that must be paid by the holder of an electronic cattle transaction reporting license for reporting cattle transactions through the electronic cattle transaction reporting system.

(b) All fees established under this section must, as closely as practicable, cover the cost of the development, maintenance, fee collection, and audit and administrative oversight of the electronic cattle transaction reporting system.

[ 2019 c 92 s 6; 2015 c 197 s 1.]